Wisconsin, session 2025, SB606.
do enact as follows:SB606,14Section 1. 77.52 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:SB606,2,11577.52 (13) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 1prevent evasion of the sales tax it shall be presumed that all receipts are subject to 2the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale of 3tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), 4or services is not a taxable sale at retail is upon the person who makes the sale 5unless that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or a paper certificate, in 6a manner prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, item, good, 7or service is purchased for resale or is otherwise exempt, except that no certificate is 8required for the sale of tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods 9under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (5) (a) 3., (7), 10(7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), (20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), 11(44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), (67), (71), and (72), and (76).SB606,212Section 2. 77.53 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:SB606,3,21377.53 (10) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 14prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it is presumed 15that tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), 16(c), or (d), or taxable services sold by any person for delivery in this state is sold for 17storage, use, or other consumption in this state until the contrary is established. 18The burden of proving the contrary is upon the person who makes the sale unless 19that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or paper certificate, in a manner 20prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, or items, property, or 21goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or (d), or taxable service is purchased for resale, or 22otherwise exempt from the tax, except that no certificate is required for the sale of 23tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or 24(d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (7), (7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), 1(20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), (44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), 2(67), (71), and (72), and (76).SB606,33Section 3. 77.54 (76) of the statutes is created to read:SB606,3,6477.54 (76) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other 5consumption of any of the following if sold on July 4 and during the 3rd week of 6December:SB606,3,77(a) Firearms, including accessories, attachments, and parts.SB606,3,88(b) Bows and arrows for archery and crossbows, including accessories.SB606,3,99(c) Ammunition.SB606,410Section 4. Effective date.SB606,3,1211(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 12publication.SB606,3,1313